Utah statutes.
23-20-29.5.   Interference with hunters or hunting activity -- Prosecution under criminal code.

A person who intentionally interferes with a person who is licensed and taking wildlife legally under the provision of Title 23, Chapter 19, or disrupts an activity involving a legal hunt, trapping, falconry, or predator control may be charged with a violation under Section 76-9-102 if that interference or disruption constitutes a violation under Section 76-9-102.



Enacted by Chapter 87, 1994 General Session

